test/src/morphology/N-maskisin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - maskisin - ok : # -m inanimate noun, shoe
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg: maskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl: maskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Loc: maskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg: maskisinisis
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl: maskisinisisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Loc: maskisinisisihk
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: omaskisiniyiw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimaskisininân
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimaskisininaw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimaskisiniwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omaskisiniwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: omaskisiniyiw
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: omaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: omaskisiniyiwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimaskisininâna
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimaskisininawa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimaskisiniwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: omaskisiniwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: omaskisiniyiwa
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nimaskisinisis
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kimaskisinisis
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: omaskisinisis
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: omaskisinisisiyiw
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nimaskisinisisinân
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kimaskisinisisinaw
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kimaskisinisisiwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: omaskisinisisiwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: omaskisinisisyiw
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nimaskisinisisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kimaskisinisisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: omaskisinisisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: omaskisinisisiyiwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nimaskisinisisinâna
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kimaskisinisisinawa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kimaskisinisisiwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: omaskisinisisiwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: omaskisinisisyiwa
     
     maskisin+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: omaskisinyihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nisinânihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimaskisinnâhk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kisiwâwihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: osiwâwihk 
     maskisin+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: omaskisinyihk

     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskisinisisihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskisinisisihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskisinisisihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: omaskisinssiyihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nimaskisinisisnânihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kimaskisinssinâh
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kimaskisinisiswâwihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: omaskisinisiswâwihk
     maskisin+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: omaskisinisisiyihk
